Hawaii, session 2026, SB510.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the division of aquatic resources (DAR) of the department of land and natural resources issued a fishing moratorium in the waters surrounding the Lapakahi state historical park.  DAR intended for the moratorium to restore overfished species, support the local ecological balance, and honor the region's rich cultural and historical significance.  Studies conducted by DAR indicate that fish populations in the Lapakahi marine life conservation district have rebounded and coral health has improved since the adoption of the moratorium.  However, the moratorium has also negatively affected local fishers and surrounding communities that rely on these waters for their incomes and livelihoods. The legislature further finds that the moratorium on fishing in the Lapakahi marine life conservation district is no longer necessary as recent assessments indicate that populations of key fish species have recovered.  To address the economic needs of the local community and to ensure the preservation of the marine resources in the conservation district, fishing should be reintroduced to the area under sustainable management protocols.  Reintroducing sustainable fishing practices with the proper rules and regulations will benefit the local economy, reinvigorate local fishing activity, and establish guidelines for sustainable fishing to ensure that marine resources remain available and plentiful.  Lifting the moratorium will also provide the local community with an opportunity to provide input and collaborate with the department in the management of the conservation district. Therefore, the purpose of this measure is to direct the department of land and natural resources to adopt rules lifting the moratorium on fishing in the Lapakahi marine life conservation district. SECTION 2. The department of land and natural resources shall adopt rules lifting the moratorium on fishing in the Lapakahi marine life conservation district. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________